Tennessee, session 114, SB0154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-4-202, is amended by deleting the
language "May 21, 2020" in subdivision (d)(2) and substituting instead the language "May 21,
2032".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0154
001289
- 1 -